Nevada, session 83, SB335.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 629 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A provider of health care shall not provide, or supervise
the provision of, electroconvulsive therapy to a person who is less
than 18 years of age regardless of the willingness of the person or
his or her parent or legal guardian to authorize such therapy.
2. A provider of health care who violates any provision of this
section is guilty of unprofessional conduct and is subject to
disciplinary action by the board, agency or other entity in this
State by which he or she is licensed, certified or registered.
3. As used in this section, “electroconvulsive therapy” means
the induction of a major motor seizure by applying a brief intense
-
*SB335*

– 2 –
electrical current to the head of the person used to treat severe
psychiatric disturbances.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB335*